Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1893.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified


in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 11-103.6q of Title 70, unless


there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:


A. This act shall be known and may be cited as the “Teacher


Shortage Reduction Act”.





Req. No. 3378 Page 1


B. Beginning with the 2027-2028 high school graduating class, a


school district shall implement an education endorsement graduation


recognition for students who have:


1. Met the curricular requirements set forth in Section 11-


103.6 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes for a standard diploma;


2. Identified teaching or another education profession as a


career goal on their individual career and academic plan (ICAP)


created pursuant to Section 1210.508-4 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma


Statutes; and


3. Participated in an apprenticeship, internship, or mentorship


related to teaching or another education profession pursuant to the


Apprenticeships, Internships and Mentorships (AIM) Act of 2016.


C. A graduation recognition awarded pursuant to this section


may be indicated on the diploma and the high school transcript of


students who meet the requirements of subsection B of this section.


D. 1. Beginning with the 2027-2028 high school graduating


class, the Oklahoma State Regents for Higher Education shall


implement an education designation for students who earn an


education endorsement graduation recognition pursuant to the


provisions of subsection B of this section and who graduate with


thirty (30) or more college credit hours or an associate’s degree


through concurrent enrollment at an institution of higher education


within The Oklahoma State System of Higher Education. An education


designation awarded pursuant to this subsection may be indicated on

Req. No. 3378 Page 2


the degree and the institution of higher education transcript of the


students who qualify.


2. If a student is awarded an education designation pursuant to


the provisions of paragraph 1 of this subsection and subsequently


enrolls in an institution of higher education within The Oklahoma


State System of Higher Education to earn a degree in pursuit of a


career in teaching or another education profession, the student


shall be accepted into the institution’s college of education. The


institution shall grant credit for field experience the student may


have earned pursuant to paragraph 3 of subsection B of this section.


E. The State Board of Education and the Oklahoma State Regents


for Higher Education may promulgate rules to implement the


provisions of this section.


SECTION 2. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.


SECTION 3. It being immediately necessary for the preservation


of the public peace, health, or safety, an emergency is hereby


declared to exist, by reason whereof this act shall take effect and


be in full force from and after its passage and approval.




60-2-3378 EB 1/15/2026 8:32:28 AM









Req. No. 3378 Page 3